Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-804
Revenue bonds; plans and specifications; engineer.

Before the issuance of any revenue bonds the city of the first class shall have an independent and qualified firm of engineers prepare plans and specifications for such improvements. In the preparation of the plans and specifications, the independent engineer shall collaborate and counsel with any city engineering or traffic departments so as to coordinate the program with the program for the control of traffic within such respective city.

Laws 1955, c. 35, § 4, p. 145.